District of Columbia statutes.
29-401.40

Subordination to canon law or other religious doctrine.

If religious doctrine or canon law governing the affairs of a religious corporation is inconsistent with this chapter on the same subject, the religious doctrine or canon law shall control to the extent required by the Constitution of the United States.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History